Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.035

Exchange of health information—Advisory board, discretionary—Director's authority.

(1) The director shall design, implement, and maintain a consumer-centric health information infrastructure and the state electronic health record repositories that will facilitate the secure exchange of health information when and where needed and shall:

(a) Complete the plan of initial implementation, including but not limited to determining the technical infrastructure for the state electronic health record repositories and the account locator service, setting criteria and standards for health record repositories, and determining oversight of the state health records service;

(b) Implement the first state health record repositories as funding allows;

(c) Involve health care consumers in meaningful ways in the design, implementation, oversight, and dissemination of information on the state health record repositories system; and

(d) Promote adoption of electronic medical records and health information exchange through continuation of the Washington health information collaborative, and by working with private payors and other organizations in restructuring reimbursement to provide incentives for providers to adopt electronic medical records in their practices.

(2) The director may establish an advisory board, a stakeholder committee, and subcommittees to assist in carrying out the duties under this section. The director may reappoint health information infrastructure advisory board members to assure continuity and shall appoint any additional representatives that may be required for their expertise and experience.

(a) The director shall appoint the chair of the advisory board, chairs, and cochairs of the stakeholder committee, if formed;

(b) Meetings of the board, stakeholder committee, and any advisory group are subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act, including RCW 42.30.110(1)(l), which authorizes an executive session during a regular or special meeting to consider proprietary or confidential nonpublished information; and

(c) The members of the board, stakeholder committee, and any advisory group:

(i) Shall agree to the terms and conditions imposed by the director regarding conflicts of interest as a condition of appointment;

(ii) Are immune from civil liability for any official acts performed in good faith as members of the board, stakeholder committee, or any advisory group.

(3) Members of the board may be compensated for participation in accordance with a personal services contract to be executed after appointment and before commencement of activities related to the work of the board. Members of the stakeholder committee shall not receive compensation but shall be reimbursed under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) The director may work with public and private entities to develop and encourage the use of personal health records which are portable, interoperable, secure, and respectful of patients' privacy.

(5) The director may enter into contracts to issue, distribute, and administer grants that are necessary or proper to carry out this section.

[ 2023 c 51 s 8; 2007 c 259 s 10.]

NOTES:

Subheadings not law—2007 c 259: See note following RCW 7.70.060.